District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34d

Bond authorization.

(a)

The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of Bonds in an aggregate amount not to exceed $4 million to fund costs of the Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project, including Development Costs, the financing costs and costs of issuance, capitalized interest, establishment of debt service or other reserve funds related to the Bonds, and any other debt program-related costs as determined by the Chief Financial Officer.

(b)

The Mayor may pay from the proceeds of the Bonds, the costs and expenses incurred by the District of Columbia in issuing and delivering the Bonds.

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 5, 57 DCR 9873
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).